Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:(1) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, each school district shall develop a cardiac emergency response plan for each school within the district and for each athletic facility on a school campus, to prepare for persons who may experience a cardiac arrest on school property, including participants and attendees of athletic practices and events.(2) School officials shall work with local emergency service providers to integrate the cardiac emergency response plans into the community's emergency service response protocols.(3)(a) Each cardiac emergency response plan required by this section must include evidence-based core elements, such as those recommended by the American heart association or other evidence-based organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care.(b) Each cardiac emergency response plan must:(i) Designate a cardiac emergency response team comprised of school staff and inclusive of coaches, school nurses, athletic trainers, teachers, counselors, and administrators;(ii) Establish procedures for activating the cardiac emergency response team if a person experiences cardiac arrest on school property;(iii) Designate locations for the installation of automated external defibrillators throughout campus, including at each campus athletic facility, with the goal of being able to place an automated external defibrillator on a person within three minutes of becoming aware of a cardiac arrest;(iv) Establish a regular maintenance schedule, in accordance with the manufacturer's operational guidelines, for automated external defibrillators installed on school property;(v) Establish a regular schedule, consistent with guidelines set by the American heart association or other evidence-based organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care, for cardiac emergency response team training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation, first aid, and automated external defibrillator use;(vi) Establish dates, at least annually, when the plan will be rehearsed in each school by the individuals who will be responsible for executing the plan in an emergency;(vii) Describe the coordination and integration of the cardiac emergency response plan with local emergency service providers; and(viii) Establish procedures for responding to incidents of cardiac arrest that occur off-campus during school-sponsored events.(4) Staff from each school shall review and update their cardiac emergency response plan at least annually.(5) School staff training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation, first aid, and automated external defibrillator use must follow evidence-based guidelines set by the American heart association or other evidence-based organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care.(6) Locations for automated external defibrillator installations must be determined by the cardiac emergency response plan and in accordance with guidelines set by the American heart association or other evidence-based organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care. Each automated external defibrillator must be identified with clear signage and stored in an unlocked location on school property that is easily accessible during the school day and during school-sponsored athletic events or team practices in which pupils of the school are participating.(7) Each automated external defibrillator must be tested and maintained by the school according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines and local emergency service providers must be notified of its type and location.--- END ---